Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3650.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 56 O.S. 2021, Section 4002.12, as
last amended by Section 7, Chapter 448, O.S.L. 2024 (56 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 4002.12), is amended to read as follows:
Section 4002.12. A. Until July 1, 2027 July 1, 2028, the
Oklahoma Health Care Authority shall establish minimum rates of
reimbursement from contracted entities to providers who elect not to
enter into value-based payment arrangements under subsection B of
this section or other alternative payment agreements for health care
items and services furnished by such providers to enrollees of the
state Medicaid program. Except as provided by subsection I of this
section, until July 1, 2027 July 1, 2028, such reimbursement rates
shall be equal to or greater than:
1. For an item or service provided by a participating provider
who is in the network of the contracted entity, one hundred percent
(100%) of the reimbursement rate for the applicable service in the
applicable fee schedule of the Authority; or

2. For an item or service provided by a non-participating
provider or a provider who is not in the network of the contracted
entity, ninety percent (90%) of the reimbursement rate for the
applicable service in the applicable fee schedule of the Authority
as of January 1, 2021.
B. A contracted entity shall offer value-based payment
arrangements to all providers in its network capable of entering
into value-based payment arrangements. Such arrangements shall be
optional for the provider but shall be tied to reimbursement
incentives when quality metrics are met. The quality measures used
by a contracted entity to determine reimbursement amounts to
providers in value-based payment arrangements shall align with the
quality measures of the Authority for contracted entities.
C. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the
Authority shall comply with payment methodologies required by
federal law or regulation for specific types of providers including,
but not limited to, Federally Qualified Health Centers, rural health
clinics, pharmacies, Indian Health Care Providers and emergency
services.
D. A contracted entity shall offer all rural health clinics
(RHCs) contracts that reimburse RHCs using the methodology in place
for each specific RHC prior to January 1, 2023, including any and
all annual rate updates. The contracted entity shall comply with
all federal program rules and requirements, and the transformed
Medicaid delivery system shall not interfere with the program as
designed.
E. The Oklahoma Health Care Authority shall establish minimum
rates of reimbursement from contracted entities to Certified
Community Behavioral Health Clinic (CCBHC) providers who elect
alternative payment arrangements equal to the prospective payment
system rate under the Medicaid State Plan.
F. The Authority shall establish an incentive payment under the
Supplemental Hospital Offset Payment Program that is determined by
value-based outcomes for providers other than hospitals.
G. Psychologist reimbursement shall reflect outcomes.
Reimbursement shall not be limited to therapy and shall include but
not be limited to testing and assessment.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3650 Page 2

H. Coverage for Medicaid ground transportation services by
licensed Oklahoma emergency medical services shall be reimbursed at
no less than the published Medicaid rates as set by the Authority.
All currently published Medicaid Healthcare Common Procedure Coding
System (HCPCS) codes paid by the Authority shall continue to be paid
by the contracted entity. The contracted entity shall comply with
all reimbursement policies established by the Authority for the
ambulance providers. Contracted entities shall accept the modifiers
established by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services
currently in use by Medicare at the time of the transport of a
member that is dually eligible for Medicare and Medicaid.
I. 1. The rate paid to participating pharmacy providers is
independent of subsection A of this section and shall be the same as
the fee-for-service rate employed by the Authority for the Medicaid
program as stated in the payment methodology in OAC 317:30-5-78,
unless the participating pharmacy provider elects to enter into
other alternative payment agreements.
2. A pharmacy or pharmacist shall receive direct payment or
reimbursement from the Authority or contracted entity when providing
a health care service to the Medicaid member at a rate no less than
that of other health care providers for providing the same service.
J. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section,
anesthesia shall continue to be reimbursed equal to or greater than
the anesthesia fee schedule established by the Authority as of
January 1, 2021. Anesthesia providers may also enter into value-
based payment arrangements under this section or alternative payment
arrangements for services furnished to Medicaid members.
K. The Authority shall specify in the requests for proposals a
reasonable time frame in which a contracted entity shall have
entered into a certain percentage, as determined by the Authority,
of value-based contracts with providers.
L. Capitation rates established by the Oklahoma Health Care
Authority and paid to contracted entities under capitated contracts
shall be updated annually and in accordance with 42 C.F.R., Section
438.3. Capitation rates shall be approved as actuarially sound as
determined by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services in
accordance with 42 C.F.R., Section 438.4 and the following:
ENR. H. B. NO. 3650 Page 3

1. Actuarial calculations must include utilization and
expenditure assumptions consistent with industry and local
standards; and
2. Capitation rates shall be risk-adjusted and shall include a
portion that is at risk for achievement of quality and outcomes
measures.
M. The Authority may establish a symmetric risk corridor for
contracted entities.
N. The Authority shall establish a process for annual recovery
of funds from, or assessment of penalties on, contracted entities
that do not meet the medical loss ratio standards stipulated in
Section 4002.5 of this title.
O. 1. The Authority shall, through the financial reporting
required under subsection G of Section 4002.12b of this title,
determine the percentage of health care expenses by each contracted
entity on primary care services.
2. Not later than the end of the fourth year of the initial
contracting period, each contracted entity shall be currently
spending not less than eleven percent (11%) of its total health care
expenses on primary care services.
3. The Authority shall monitor the primary care spending of
each contracted entity and require each contracted entity to
maintain the level of spending on primary care services stipulated
in paragraph 2 of this subsection.
P. 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A of this
section but subject to all other provisions of this section, for an
item or service delivered under a multistate contract, the
reimbursement rate for that item or service shall be the lesser of:
a. the rate specified in the multistate contract, or
b. the applicable rate in the fee schedule of the
Authority.
2. The Oklahoma Health Care Authority Board may promulgate
rules to implement the provisions of this section including, but not
limited to, rules that further define the terms used in this
ENR. H. B. NO. 3650 Page 4

subsection or that set limitations or restrictions around the
applicability of the provisions of this subsection.
3. As used in this subsection:
a. “multistate contract” means a contract that a
contracted entity or its parent company holds with
another entity under which the entity provides health
care services on behalf of the contracted entity
throughout a service area that includes this state and
at least one other state, and
b. “parent company” means any company that directly or
indirectly controls a contracted entity.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3650 Page 5

Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 29th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 3650 Page 6